Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
CHAPTER 7 Plant Disease, Pest Control, and Pesticides

Cross references.

Preservation of forest resources and other plant life generally, T. 12, C. 6.

Authority of Commissioner to quarantine animals bearing residue of pesticides, insecticides, and other chemicals, §

26-2-150

et seq.

Persons engaged in structural pest control, T. 43, C. 45.